Georgia statutes. TITLE 28 General Assembly
Article 2 Fiscal Affairs Subcommittees

28-5-20.
Creation.

There are created a Fiscal Affairs Subcommittee of the Senate and a Fiscal Affairs Subcommittee of the House of Representatives.

History.

Ga. L. 1966, p. 293, § 1; Ga. L. 1967, p. 722, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1986, “are” was substituted for “is”.

28-5-21.
Selection and term of service of members.

The Fiscal Affairs Subcommittee of the Senate shall be composed of:

Four incumbent members of the Senate Appropriations Committee who were reelected, to be selected by the President-Elect of the Senate, if there be one, or if not, by the President of the Senate;

Five incumbent members of the Senate who were reelected, to be selected by the Governor; and

The Lieutenant Governor-Elect, if there be one, or if not, the Lieutenant Governor.

The Fiscal Affairs Subcommittee of the House of Representatives shall be composed of:

Four incumbent members of the House Appropriations Committee who were reelected, to be selected by the Speaker-of-the-House-Nominate (that is, the member of the House who has been nominated Speaker in the caucus of the political party having a majority of the members elected to the House of Representatives in the general election);

Five incumbent members of the House who were reelected, to be selected by the Governor; and

The Speaker-of-the-House-Nominate, as defined in paragraph (1) of this subsection.

The members of each of these subcommittees shall be selected within 30 days after each general election for members of the General Assembly.

Each such subcommittee shall serve until the successor subcommittee is composed and appointed after each successive general election for members of the General Assembly.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 722, § 2.

28-5-22.
Meetings generally.

The Fiscal Affairs Subcommittee of the Senate shall meet from time to time at the call of the President of the Senate or the chairman of the Senate subcommittee; and the Fiscal Affairs Subcommittee of the House shall meet from time to time at the call of the Speaker of the House of Representatives or the chairman of the House subcommittee. Such subcommittees may meet jointly at the call of the Lieutenant Governor and the Speaker or of the respective subcommittee chairmen.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 722, § 3.

28-5-23.
Review of budget requests.

The fiscal affairs subcommittee of each house shall have the authority to review the budget requests of the various departments, bureaus, boards, commissions, institutions, and other state agencies at any time; and the Office of Planning and Budget, the state auditor, and each such department, bureau, board, commission, institute, and other state agency shall promptly furnish to such subcommittees, or either of them, all information requested by them, or by either of them.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 722, § 4.

28-5-24.
Annual report to General Assembly.

The fiscal affairs subcommittees of the Senate and the House jointly shall make an annual report to the General Assembly of matters coming to their attention, together with such recommendations to improve the efficiency in the operation and management of the various departments, boards, bureaus, commissions, institutions, and other agencies of state government as they see fit.
The subcommittees shall not be required to distribute copies of the annual report to the members of the General Assembly but shall notify the members of the availability of the annual report in the manner which they deem to be most effective and efficient.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 722, § 5; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1036, § 23/SB 49.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2005, “they deem” was substituted for “it deems” near the end of the second sentence in this Code section.

28-5-25.
Joint meetings to review and approve budget unit object class transfers; limitations upon transfers.

The fiscal affairs subcommittees shall meet jointly as one committee at least once each quarter, or more often, at the call of the Governor, for the purpose of reviewing and approving budget unit object class transfers recommended by the Governor. Such transfers shall not be made without the approval of at least 11 members of such subcommittees sitting jointly. No funds whatsoever shall be transferred for use in commencing any new program or activity which does not currently have an appropriation or which would require operating funds or capital outlay funds beyond the biennium in which such transfer is made.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 722, § 6.

28-5-25.1.
Approval of leases.

No lease of property owned by a state authority shall become valid until and unless the lease is approved by the fiscal affairs subcommittees meeting jointly at the call of the Governor if such lease is a lease of land for the acquisition of which state funds were appropriated, directly or indirectly, by an appropriations Act which specified that such lease must be approved by the fiscal affairs subcommittees.

The approval of any such lease shall require the affirmative votes of at least 11 members of such subcommittees meeting jointly.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-5-25.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1865, § 1.

28-5-26.
Allowances for members.

For all meetings of the subcommittees held when the General Assembly is not in session, the members of the subcommittees shall receive the expense, mileage, and travel allowances authorized by law for legislative members of interim legislative committees. The funds necessary to carry out this article shall come from funds appropriated to and available to the legislative branch of the government.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 722, § 8.

28-5-27.
Applicability of article to authority of Office of Planning and Budget.

This article shall not be construed to supersede or supplement the authority of the Office of Planning and Budget as set forth in Code Section 45-12-90.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 722, § 7.